Maryland, session 2025, SB0574.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 28–1A–01 through 28–1A–07 and the subtitle “Subtitle 1A. Montgomery
County Board of Education Compensation Commission” of Article – Local Government of
the Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 28–1B–01 through
28–1B–07, respectively, and the subtitle “Subtitle 1B. Montgomery County Board of
Education Compensation Commission”.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Education
3–701.
(a) (1) The Howard County Board consists of:
(i) Seven elected members; and
(ii) One student member.
(2) The seven elected members shall be elected as follows:
(i) One member from each of the five councilmanic districts in the
county, elected by the voters of that district; and
(ii) Two members at large, elected by the voters of the county.
(c) The seven elected members of the Howard County Board shall be elected:
(1) Beginning in 2020, at the general election every 2 years as required by
subsection (d) of this section; and
(2) As specified in subsection (a) of this section.

SENATE BILL 574 3
(d) (1) (i) The terms of the elected members are staggered as provided in
this subsection.
(ii) Each term of office begins on the first Monday in December after
the election of a member and until a successor is elected and qualifies.
(2) (i) 1. The [term] TERMS of office of [each member elected from
a councilmanic district, beginning at the 2020 election, is 4 years] THE MEMBERS
ELECTED FROM A COUNCILMANIC DISTRICT AT THE 2028 ELECTION ARE:
A. FOR THE TWO ELECTED MEMBERS WHO RECEIVE THE
HIGHEST PERCENTAGE OF VOTES, 6 YEARS; AND
B. FOR THE THREE ELECTED MEMBERS WHO RECEIVE
THE LOWEST PERCENTAGE OF VOTES, 4 YEARS.
2. The [term] TERMS of office of [each member] THE TWO
MEMBERS elected at large[, beginning] at the [2022] 2026 election[, is 4 years] ARE:
A. FOR THE INDIVIDUAL WHO RECEIVES THE HIGHEST
NUMBER OF VOTES, 6 YEARS; AND
B. FOR THE INDIVIDUAL WHO RECEIVES THE SECOND
HIGHEST NUMBER OF VOTES, 4 YEARS.
(ii) The successors to [the]:
1. THE offices OF THE THREE MEMBERS elected at the
[2020 and 2022 elections, respectively, shall serve for a term of 4 years] 2028 ELECTION
WHO RECEIVED THE LOWEST PERCENTAGE OF VOTES SHALL BE ELECTED AT THE
2032 ELECTION AND EVERY 4 YEARS THEREAFTER AND SHALL SERVE FOR A TERM
OF 4 YEARS;
2. THE OFFICES OF THE TWO MEMBERS ELECTED AT
THE 2028 ELECTION WHO RECEIVED THE HIGHEST PERCENTAGE OF VOTES SHALL
BE ELECTED AT THE 2034 ELECTION AND EVERY 4 YEARS THEREAFTER AND SHALL
SERVE FOR A TERM OF 4 YEARS;
3. THE OFFICE OF THE MEMBER ELECTED AT LARGE AT
THE 2026 ELECTION WHO RECEIVED THE HIGHEST NUMBER OF VOTES IN THAT
ELECTION SHALL BE ELECTED AT THE 2032 ELECTION AND EVERY 4 YEARS
THEREAFTER AND SHALL SERVE A TERM OF 4 YEARS; AND

SENATE BILL 574
4. THE OFFICE OF THE MEMBER ELECTED AT LARGE AT
THE 2026 ELECTION WHO RECEIVED THE SECOND HIGHEST NUMBER OF VOTES IN
THAT ELECTION SHALL BE ELECTED AT THE 2030 ELECTION AND EVERY 4 YEARS
THEREAFTER AND SHALL SERVE A TERM OF 4 YEARS.
(III) IN THE EVENT OF A TIE BETWEEN ELECTED MEMBERS
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE LOCAL BOARD OF ELECTIONS
SHALL ADMINISTER A RANDOM DRAWING TO DETERMINE THE TERM OF OFFICE FOR
EACH ELECTED MEMBER INVOLVED IN THE TIE.
3–703.
(a) (1) The chair of the county board is entitled to receive:
(I) $18,000 annually as compensation [and the]; OR
(II) AN ANNUAL SALARY SET THROUGH LEGISLATION BASED ON
THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE HOWARD COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION
COMPENSATION COMMISSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 28, SUBTITLE 1A OF
THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE other elected members are entitled to receive:
(I) $16,000 each annually as compensation; OR
(II) AN ANNUAL SALARY SET THROUGH LEGISLATION BASED ON
THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE HOWARD COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION
COMPENSATION COMMISSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 28, SUBTITLE 1A OF
THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(b) After submitting vouchers under the rules and regulations adopted by the
county board, the chair and the other elected members are entitled to receive
reimbursement for travel and other expenses as provided in the Howard County budget.
(c) The employer’s share for State retirement and pension contributions made on
behalf of the chair and other elected board members may not be considered compensation
for the purpose of calculating compensation under subsection (a) of this section.
(d) (1) The chair and other elected board members may participate in health
insurance and other benefit programs sponsored by the board.
(2) An elected board member’s participation in a benefit program
sponsored by the board under this subsection may not be considered compensation for the
purpose of calculating compensation under subsection (a) of this section.

SENATE BILL 574 5
(e) (1) (i) A student member who completes a full term on the board shall
be entitled to a scholarship of:
1. $5,000 to be applied to the student’s higher education
costs; OR
2. A SCHOLARSHIP AMOUNT SET THROUGH
LEGISLATION BASED ON THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE HOWARD COUNTY BOARD
OF EDUCATION COMPENSATION COMMISSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 28,
SUBTITLE 1A OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(ii) The scholarship shall be paid directly to the educational
institution that the student attends.
(iii) A student may receive only one scholarship regardless of the
number of terms the student serves as the student member of the county board.
(iv) The scholarship may not be considered compensation for the
purpose of calculating taxable income.
(2) On the submission of expense vouchers, the student member is entitled
to reimbursement for travel and other expenses incurred in the performance of official
duties for the county board.
(3) The student member is not entitled to any compensation or payment
other than that specified under paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection for their work as
the student member of the county board.
Article – Local Government
SUBTITLE 1A. HOWARD COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION COMPENSATION
COMMISSION.
28–1A–01.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “COMMISSION” MEANS THE HOWARD COUNTY BOARD OF
EDUCATION COMPENSATION COMMISSION.
28–1A–02.
THERE IS A HOWARD COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION COMPENSATION
COMMISSION.
28–1A–03.

SENATE BILL 574
(A) (1) THE COMMISSION CONSISTS OF FIVE RESIDENTS OF HOWARD
COUNTY APPOINTED BY THE HOWARD COUNTY EXECUTIVE AND CONFIRMED BY
THE HOWARD COUNTY COUNCIL.
(2) MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION SHALL BE APPOINTED ON OR
BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, AND EVERY 4 YEARS THEREAFTER.
(B) A MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION MAY NOT:
(1) BE EMPLOYED BY THE HOWARD COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION;
OR
(2) HAVE A RELATIVE WHO IS A MEMBER OF THE HOWARD COUNTY
BOARD OF EDUCATION.
(C) A MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION MAY BE REMOVED BY THE HOWARD
COUNTY COUNCIL FOR THE SAME CAUSES AND SUBJECT TO THE SAME PROCEDURES
AS SET FORTH IN § 3–701(H) OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
28–1A–04.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL ELECT A CHAIR FROM AMONG ITS MEMBERS.
(B) THE COMMISSION SHALL DETERMINE THE TIME AND PLACES OF ITS
MEETINGS.
(C) (1) A MAJORITY OF THE MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION IS A
QUORUM.
(2) ACTION BY THE COMMISSION REQUIRES THE AFFIRMATIVE VOTE
OF A MAJORITY OF THE COMMISSION MEMBERS PRESENT.
(D) THE HOWARD COUNTY GOVERNMENT SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE
COMMISSION.
28–1A–05.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL STUDY THE SALARIES OF THE MEMBERS OF
THE HOWARD COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION.
(B) THE COMMISSION SHALL ISSUE A REPORT TO THE HOWARD COUNTY
COUNCIL ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2026, AND EVERY 4 YEARS THEREAFTER,

SENATE BILL 574 7
REGARDING ITS RECOMMENDATIONS FOR THE APPROPRIATE COMPENSATION FOR
MEMBERS OF THE HOWARD COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION, INCLUDING:
(1) ANY ADDITIONAL STIPEND FOR THE CHAIR OF THE COUNTY
BOARD; AND
(2) A SCHOLARSHIP AMOUNT TO BE AWARDED TO A STUDENT
MEMBER OF THE COUNTY BOARD WHO COMPLETES A FULL TERM ON THE COUNTY
BOARD TO BE APPLIED TOWARD THE STUDENT’S HIGHER EDUCATION COSTS.
28–1A–06.
IN FORMULATING ITS REPORT AND RECOMMENDATIONS, THE COMMISSION
SHALL CONSIDER FOR EACH MEMBER OF THE HOWARD COUNTY BOARD OF
EDUCATION:
(1) THE SCOPE OF RESPONSIBILITIES OF A COUNTY BOARD MEMBER;
(2) THE EDUCATION, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES NECESSARY TO
PERFORM THE DUTIES OF A COUNTY BOARD MEMBER;
(3) THE SALARIES OF SIMILAR COUNTY BOARD MEMBERS IN OTHER
JURISDICTIONS;
(4) THE TIME REQUIRED TO PERFORM THE DUTIES OF A COUNTY
BOARD MEMBER;
(5) THE SALARIES OF SUBORDINATE EMPLOYEES UNDER THE DIRECT
SUPERVISION OF THE COUNTY BOARD;
(6) THE VOLUME AND WORKLOAD OF THE COUNTY BOARD; AND
(7) ANY OTHER RELEVANT INFORMATION.
28–1A–07.
(A) IN EACH APPLICABLE YEAR, AFTER REVIEWING THE COMMISSION’S
REPORT AND RECOMMENDATIONS, THE HOWARD COUNTY COUNCIL MAY, BY
RESOLUTION, RECOMMEND THAT THE MEMBERS OF THE HOWARD COUNTY
DELEGATION TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ALTER THE SALARY OF MEMBERS OF THE
HOWARD COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION BY AN AMOUNT NOT MORE THAN THE
RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE COMMISSION.

SENATE BILL 574
(B) IF THE HOWARD COUNTY COUNCIL APPROVES A RESOLUTION UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, THE COUNCIL SHALL SUBMIT THE RESOLUTION
AND THE COMMISSION’S REPORT TO THE MEMBERS OF THE HOWARD COUNTY
DELEGATION TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
28–1A–08.
ON RECEIPT OF A RESOLUTION FROM THE HOWARD COUNTY COUNCIL AND
THE COMMISSION’S REPORT SUBMITTED UNDER § 28–1A–07(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE,
THE MEMBERS OF THE HOWARD COUNTY DELEGATION TO THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY MAY INTRODUCE LEGISLATION TO ALTER THE SALARY OF MEMBERS OF
THE HOWARD COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) The terms of the members of the Howard County Board of Education
elected from councilmanic districts in office on the effective date of this Act shall expire on
December 4, 2028; and
(2) The terms of the members of the Howard County Board of Education
elected by the voters of the county at large in office on the effective date of this Act shall
expire on December 7, 2026.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.